Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.900

Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

[ 2021 c 119 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 119 ss 1-6: See note following RCW 28A.225.007.

Findings—Intent—2021 c 119: See note following RCW 28A.225.007.